District of Columbia statutes.
47-2315

Mayor to issue rules.

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 18
July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17,§ 6(c), 36 DCR 4160
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(o), 46 DCR 2118
Tax rates, records and surplus funds, authority of Council to change certain tax rates, see § 47-504.
1981 Ed., § 47-2315.
1973 Ed., § 47-1916.